Utah statutes.
59-7-404.   Calculation of unadjusted income for combined reporting.
(1)  A group filing a combined report under Section 59-7-402 or 59-7-403 shall
calculate unadjusted income of the combined group by:
(a)  computing unadjusted income on a separate return basis;
(b)  combining income or loss of the members included in the combined report;
and
(c)  making appropriate eliminations and adjustments between members included
in the combined report.
(2)  For purposes of this section, if an entity does not calculate federal
taxable income, then unadjusted income shall be calculated based on the
applicable federal tax laws.
